Florida, session 2026, SB1220.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 181 182 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 183 20.23, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 184 20.23âDepartment of Transportation.âThere is created a 185 Department of Transportation which shall be a decentralized 186 agency. 187 (3)âThe Legislature finds that the transportation industry 188 is critical to the economic future of this state and that the 189 competitiveness of the industry in this state depends upon the 190 development and maintenance of a qualified workforce and 191 cutting-edge research and innovation. The Legislature further 192 finds that the transportation industry in this state has varied 193 and complex workforce needs ranging from technical and 194 mechanical training to continuing education opportunities for 195 workers with advanced degrees and certifications. The timely 196 need also exists for coordinated research and innovation efforts 197 to promote emerging technologies and innovative construction 198 methods and tools and to address alternative funding mechanisms. 199 It is the intent of the Legislature to support programs designed 200 to address the workforce development needs of the stateâs 201 transportation industry. 202 (c)âThe institute shall report to the department and shall 203 be composed of members from the University of Florida, the 204 Florida State University Indian River State College, the 205 University of Central Florida, the University of South Florida, 206 and Florida International University. The department shall 207 select a member to serve as the administrative lead of the 208 institute. The department shall assess the performance of the 209 administrative lead periodically to ensure accountability and 210 assess the attainment of performance goals. 211 Section 2.âParagraph (h) of subsection (4) of section 212 260.0142, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 213 260.0142âFlorida Greenways and Trails Council; composition; 214 powers and duties.â 215 (4)âThe duties of the council include the following: 216 (h)âMake recommendations for updating and revising the 217 implementation plan for the Florida Greenways and Trails System, 218 including, but not limited to, recommendations for 219 prioritization of regionally significant trails within the 220 Florida Shared-Use Nonmotorized Trail Network. The council shall 221 meet within 90 days after the Department of Transportation 222 submits its report pursuant to s. 339.81(8) to update its 223 recommendations for prioritization of regionally significant 224 trails within the network. 225 Section 3.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 226 311.14, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 227 311.14âSeaport planning.â 228 (2)âEach port shall develop a strategic plan with a 10-year 229 horizon. Each plan must include the following: 230 (b)âAn infrastructure development and improvement component 231 that identifies all projected infrastructure improvements within 232 the plan area which require improvement, expansion, or 233 development in order for a port to attain a strategic advantage 234 for competition with national and international competitors. 235 This component must provide strategies for obtaining and 236 maintaining critical infrastructure resources for the port and 237 its tenants. Such strategies must include long-term contracts, 238 rights of first refusal regarding the sale or lease of property 239 storing such resources, and contingency plans for obtaining such 240 resources. For purposes of this paragraph, the term âcritical 241 infrastructure resources,â includes, but is not limited to, 242 access to electricity, fuel, and water resources. 243 244 To the extent feasible, the port strategic plan must be 245 consistent with the local government comprehensive plans of the 246 units of local government in which the port is located. Upon 247 approval of a plan by the portâs board, the plan shall be 248 submitted to the Florida Seaport Transportation and Economic 249 Development Council. 250 Section 4.âSection 311.26, Florida Statutes, is created to 251 read: 252 311.26âFlorida seaport maritime industrial base.âThe 253 Department of Transportation shall coordinate with the 254 Department of Commerce, the ports specified in s. 311.09, and 255 the Federal Government to identify and prioritize key maritime 256 components in the supply chain which are essential to 257 strengthening and expanding this stateâs maritime industrial 258 base. The ports shall support projects prioritized by the 259 Department of Transportation which will directly support the 260 building and construction, maintenance, and modernization of 261 commercial vessels, including cargo vessels, and vessels 262 designed for national defense. Projects must be evaluated by 263 their estimated return on invested capital, job creation, and 264 contribution to the economic competitiveness and national 265 security interests of this state and the United States. 266 Additional consideration must include the anticipated 267 enhancement of this stateâs commercial maritime capabilities. 268 Section 5.âSubsection (59) of section 316.003, Florida 269 Statutes, is amended to read: 270 316.003âDefinitions.âThe following words and phrases, when 271 used in this chapter, shall have the meanings respectively 272 ascribed to them in this section, except where the context 273 otherwise requires: 274 (59)âPERSONAL DELIVERY DEVICE.âAn electrically powered 275 device that: 276 (a)âIs operated on sidewalks, and crosswalks, bicycle 277 lanes, or bicycle paths or on the shoulders of streets, 278 roadways, or highways, not including limited access facilities, 279 and intended primarily for transporting property; 280 (b)âHas a weight that does not exceed the maximum weight 281 established by Department of Transportation rule; 282 (c)âOperates at Has a maximum speed of 10 miles per hour on 283 sidewalks and crosswalks and 20 miles per hour on bicycle lanes 284 or bicycle paths or on the shoulders of streets, roadways, or 285 highways, not including limited access facilities; and 286 (d)âIs equipped with technology to allow for operation of 287 the device with or without the active control or monitoring of a 288 natural person. 289 290 A personal delivery device is not considered a vehicle unless 291 expressly defined by law as a vehicle. A mobile carrier is not 292 considered a personal delivery device. The Department of 293 Transportation may adopt rules to implement this subsection. 294 Section 6.âParagraph (b) of subsection (7) of section 295 316.008, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (c) is 296 added to that subsection, to read: 297 316.008âPowers of local authorities.â 298 (7) 299 (b)1.âExcept as provided in subparagraphs 2. and 3. 300 subparagraph 2., a personal delivery device may be operated on 301 sidewalks, crosswalks, bicycle lanes, and bicycle paths and on 302 the shoulders of streets, roadways, and highways, not including 303 limited access facilities, and a mobile carrier may be operated 304 on sidewalks and crosswalks within a county or municipality when 305 such use is permissible under federal law. This subparagraph 306 paragraph does not restrict a county or municipality from 307 otherwise adopting regulations for the safe operation of 308 personal delivery devices and mobile carriers in a manner 309 consistent with this chapter. 310 2.âA personal delivery device may not be operated on the 311 Florida Shared-Use Nonmotorized Trail Network created under s. 312 339.81 or components of the Florida Greenways and Trails System 313 created under chapter 260 or in state forests, state parks, or 314 wildlife management areas. 315 3.âA personal delivery device or mobile carrier may not be 316 operated within a theme park or entertainment complex as defined 317 in s. 509.013(9), a state correctional institution as defined in 318 s. 944.02, a county detention facility, a county residential 319 probation center, a municipal detention facility, a reduced 320 custody housing area as defined in s. 951.23(1), or a detention 321 center or facility as defined in s. 985.03. 322 (c)âA county or municipality may not enact, impose, levy, 323 collect, or enforce: 324 1.âAn operating fee for personal delivery devices, except 325 as expressly authorized by general law; or 326 2.âAn advertising regulation that restricts, prohibits, 327 conditions, or otherwise limits commercial advertising on 328 personal delivery devices. 329 Section 7.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and subsection 330 (3) of section 316.126, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 331 316.126âOperation of vehicles and actions of pedestrians; 332 approach of authorized emergency, sanitation, or utility service 333 vehicle, wrecker, or road and bridge maintenance or construction 334 vehicle; presence of disabled motor vehicle.â 335 (1)(a)âUpon the immediate approach of an authorized 336 emergency vehicle, while en route to meet an existing emergency, 337 the driver of every other vehicle shall, when such emergency 338 vehicle is giving audible signals by siren, exhaust whistle, or 339 other adequate device, or visible signals by the use of 340 flashing, oscillating, rotating, or similarly activated 341 displayed blue or red lights, yield the right-of-way to the 342 emergency vehicle and shall immediately proceed to a position 343 parallel to, and as close as reasonable to the closest edge of 344 the curb of the roadway, clear of any intersection and shall 345 stop and remain in position until the authorized emergency 346 vehicle has passed, unless otherwise directed by a law 347 enforcement officer. The use of cruise lights by an authorized 348 emergency vehicle is not a visible signal that requires a driver 349 to yield the right-of-way. For purposes of this paragraph, the 350 term âcruise lightsâ means low intensity, continuously 351 illuminated blue or red lights displayed on an authorized 352 emergency vehicle which remain on while the vehicle is in 353 service but not actively engaged in an emergency response. 354 (3)âAn authorized emergency vehicle, when en route to meet 355 an existing emergency, shall warn all other vehicular traffic 356 along the emergency route by an audible signal, siren, exhaust 357 whistle, or other adequate device or by a visible signal by the 358 use of flashing, oscillating, rotating, or similarly activated 359 displayed blue or red lights. While en route to such emergency, 360 the emergency vehicle shall otherwise proceed in a manner 361 consistent with the laws regulating vehicular traffic upon the 362 highways of this state. 363 Section 8.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 316.2071, 364 Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsections (5) and (6) are 365 added to that section, to read: 366 316.2071âPersonal delivery devices and mobile carriers.â 367 (1)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law to the 368 contrary, a personal delivery device may operate on sidewalks, 369 crosswalks, bicycle lanes, and bicycle paths and on the 370 shoulders of streets, roadways, and highways, not including 371 limited access facilities, and a or mobile carrier may operate 372 on sidewalks and crosswalks, subject to s. 316.008(7)(b). A 373 personal delivery device or mobile carrier operating on a 374 sidewalk or crosswalk has all the rights and duties applicable 375 to a pedestrian under the same circumstances. A, except that the 376 personal delivery device or mobile carrier may must not 377 unreasonably interfere with pedestrians, bicycles, or motor 378 vehicles traffic and must yield the right-of-way to pedestrians 379 on the sidewalk or crosswalk. 380 (3)(a)âA personal delivery device and a mobile carrier may 381 not do any of the following: 382 1.(a)âOperate on a sidewalk, crosswalk, bicycle lane, or 383 bicycle path or on the shoulder of a street, roadway, or highway 384 unless the personal delivery device meets minimum criteria 385 established by the Department of Transportation and a human 386 operator is capable of controlling and monitoring the navigation 387 and operation of the personal delivery device public highway 388 except to the extent necessary to cross a crosswalk. 389 2.âTransport hazardous materials as defined in s. 316.003. 390 3.âOperate on a limited access facility. 391 (b)âA mobile carrier may not do any of the following: 392 1.âOperate on a public highway except to the extent 393 necessary to cross a crosswalk. 394 2.âOperate on a sidewalk or crosswalk unless the personal 395 delivery device operator is actively controlling or monitoring 396 the navigation and operation of the personal delivery device or 397 a mobile carrier owner remains within 25 feet of the mobile 398 carrier. 399 3.(c)âTransport hazardous materials as defined in s. 400 316.003. 401 4.(d)âFor mobile carriers, Transport persons or animals. 402 (5)âA personal delivery device or mobile carrier may not 403 operate within a theme park or entertainment complex as defined 404 in s. 509.013(9), a state correctional institution as defined in 405 s. 944.02, a county detention facility, a county residential 406 probation center, a municipal detention facility, a reduced 407 custody housing area as defined in s. 951.23(1), or a detention 408 center or facility as defined in s. 985.03. 409 (6)âThe Department of Transportation may adopt rules to 410 implement this section. 411 Section 9.âSubsection (9) of section 318.14, Florida 412 Statutes, is amended to read: 413 318.14âNoncriminal traffic infractions; exception; 414 procedures.â 415 (9)âAny person who does not hold a commercial driver 416 license or commercial learnerâs permit and who is cited while 417 driving a noncommercial motor vehicle for an infraction under 418 this section other than a violation of s. 316.183(2), s. 419 316.187, or s. 316.189 when the driver exceeds the posted limit 420 by 30 miles per hour or more, s. 320.0605, s. 320.07(3)(a) or 421 (b), s. 322.065, s. 322.15(1), s. 322.61, or s. 322.62 may, in 422 lieu of a court appearance, elect to attend in the location of 423 his or her choice within this state a basic driver improvement 424 course approved by the Department of Highway Safety and Motor 425 Vehicles. In such a case, adjudication must be withheld, any 426 civil penalty that is imposed by s. 318.18(3) must be reduced by 427 18 percent, and points, as provided by s. 322.27, may not be 428 assessed. However, a person may not make an election under this 429 subsection if the person has made an election under this 430 subsection in the preceding 12 months or has made more than 431 eight elections under this subsection in the preceding 20 years. 432 A person may not make more than eight elections within his or 433 her lifetime under this subsection. The requirement for 434 community service under s. 318.18(8) is not waived by a plea of 435 nolo contendere or by the withholding of adjudication of guilt 436 by a court. 437 Section 10.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 438 320.06, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 439 320.06âRegistration certificates, license plates, and 440 validation stickers generally.â 441 (1) 442 (b)1.âRegistration license plates bearing a graphic symbol 443 and the alphanumeric system of identification shall be issued 444 for a 10-year period. At the end of the 10-year period, upon 445 renewal, the plate shall be replaced. The department shall 446 extend the scheduled license plate replacement date from a 6 447 year period to a 10-year period. The fee for such replacement is 448 $28, $2.80 of which shall be paid each year before the plate is 449 replaced, to be credited toward the next $28 replacement fee. 450 The fees shall be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating 451 Trust Fund. A credit or refund may not be given for any prior 452 yearsâ payments of the prorated replacement fee if the plate is 453 replaced or surrendered before the end of the 10-year period, 454 except that a credit may be given if a registrant is required by 455 the department to replace a license plate under s. 456 320.08056(8)(a). With each license plate, a validation sticker 457 shall be issued showing the ownerâs birth month, license plate 458 number, and the year of expiration or the appropriate renewal 459 period if the owner is not a natural person. The validation 460 sticker shall be placed on the upper right corner of the license 461 plate. The license plate and validation sticker shall be issued 462 based on the applicantâs appropriate renewal period. The 463 registration period is 12 months, the extended registration 464 period is 24 months, and all expirations occur based on the 465 applicantâs appropriate registration period. Rental vehicles 466 taxed pursuant to s. 320.08(6)(a) and rental trucks taxed 467 pursuant to s. 320.08(3)(a)-(c) and (4)(a)-(f) (4)(a)-(d) may 468 elect a permanent registration period, provided payment of the 469 appropriate license taxes and fees occurs annually. 470 2.âBeginning July 1, 2024, a vehicle registered in 471 accordance with the International Registration Plan must be 472 issued a license plate for a 3-year period. At the end of the 3 473 year period, upon renewal, the license plate must be replaced. 474 Each license plate must include a validation sticker showing the 475 month of expiration. A cab card denoting the declared gross 476 vehicle weight for each apportioned jurisdiction must be issued 477 annually. The fee for an original or a renewal cab card is $28, 478 which must be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust 479 Fund. If the license plate is damaged or worn, it may be 480 replaced at no charge by applying to the department and 481 surrendering the current license plate. 482 3.âIn order to retain the efficient administration of the 483 taxes and fees imposed by this chapter, the 80-cent fee increase 484 in the replacement fee imposed by chapter 2009-71, Laws of 485 Florida, is negated as provided in s. 320.0804. 486 Section 11.âSection 322.032, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 487 Section 12.âSection 322.059, Florida Statutes, is amended 488 to read: 489 322.059âMandatory surrender of suspended driver license and 490 registration.âA person whose driver license or registration has 491 been suspended as provided in s. 322.058 must immediately return 492 his or her driver license and registration to the Department of 493 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles. The department shall 494 invalidate the digital proof of driver license issued pursuant 495 to s. 322.032 for such person. If such person fails to return 496 his or her driver license or registration, a law enforcement 497 agent may seize the license or registration while the driver 498 license or registration is suspended. 499 Section 13.âSubsection (1) of section 322.15, Florida 500 Statutes, is amended to read: 501 322.15âLicense to be carried and exhibited on demand; 502 fingerprint to be imprinted upon a citation.â 503 (1)âEvery licensee shall have his or her driver license, 504 which must be fully legible with no portion of such license 505 faded, altered, mutilated, or defaced, in his or her immediate 506 possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle and shall 507 present or submit the same upon the demand of a law enforcement 508 officer or an authorized representative of the department. A 509 licensee may present or submit a digital proof of driver license 510 as provided in s. 322.032 in lieu of his or her printed driver 511 license; however, if the law enforcement officer or authorized 512 representative of the department is unable to immediately verify 513 the digital proof of driver license, upon the demand of the law 514 enforcement officer or authorized representative of the 515 department, the licensee must present or submit his or her 516 printed driver license. 517 Section 14.âSection 324.252, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 518 Section 15.âPresent paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of 519 section 330.41, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph 520 (f), a new paragraph (d) and paragraph (e) are added to that 521 subsection, and paragraph (c) of that subsection is amended, to 522 read: 523 330.41âUnmanned Aircraft Systems Act.â 524 (3)âREGULATION.â 525 (c)âExcept as otherwise expressly provided, a political 526 subdivision may not withhold issuance of a business tax receipt, 527 development permit, or other land use approval to a drone 528 delivery service on a commercial property or enact or enforce an 529 ordinance or a resolution that prohibits a drone delivery 530 serviceâs operation based on the location of its drone port, 531 notwithstanding part II of chapter 163 and chapter 205. A 532 political subdivision may enforce minimum setback and 533 landscaping regulations that are generally applicable to 534 permitted uses in the applicable drone port siteâs zoning 535 district. This paragraph may not be construed to authorize a 536 political subdivision to require additional landscaping as a 537 condition of approval of a drone delivery service on a 538 commercial property port. 539 (d)1.âFor the purpose of this paragraph, the term âmajor 540 theme park or entertainment complexâ means a complex comprised 541 of at least 75 acres of land with permanent exhibitions and a 542 variety of recreational activities, which has at least 1 million 543 visitors annually who pay admission fees thereto, together with 544 any lodging, dining, and recreational facilities located 545 adjacent to, contiguous to, or in close proximity to the 546 complex, as long as the owner and operator of the complex, or a 547 parent or related company or subsidiary thereof, has an equity 548 interest in the lodging, dining, or recreational facilities or 549 is in privity therewith. 550 2.âA drone delivery service is prohibited from operating 551 over or delivering to a major theme park or entertainment 552 complex without express written approval provided by the owner 553 of the major theme park or entertainment complex to the owner or 554 operator of the drone delivery device. 555 (e)âThe addition of a drone delivery service within the 556 parking area of a commercial property does not reduce the number 557 of parking spaces in the parking area for the purpose of 558 complying with any requirement for a minimum number of parking 559 spaces. 560 Section 16.âSubsection (1) of section 332.001, Florida 561 Statutes, is amended to read: 562 332.001âAviation; powers and duties of the Department of 563 Transportation.â 564 (1)âIt shall be the duty, function, and responsibility of 565 the Department of Transportation to plan and direct investments 566 in airport systems in this state to facilitate the efficient 567 movement of passengers and cargo and to continuously improve the 568 experience for the flying public and the supply chain of this 569 stateâs businesses. In carrying out this duty and 570 responsibility, the department may assist and advise, cooperate, 571 and coordinate with the federal, state, local, or private 572 organizations and individuals in planning such systems of 573 airports. 574 Section 17.âSubsection (10) is added to section 332.006, 575 Florida Statutes, to read: 576 332.006âDuties and responsibilities of the Department of 577 Transportation.âThe Department of Transportation shall, within 578 the resources provided to the department: 579 (10)âCoordinate with commercial service airports in this 580 state to review and evaluate policies and programs of the United 581 States Transportation Security Administration, including, but 582 not limited to, security screening programs and programs for 583 veterans and active duty servicemembers and their families, to 584 improve efficiency in airport operations and the overall 585 experience of the traveling public. 586 Section 18.âPresent subsections (4), (5), and (6) of 587 section 332.0075, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 588 subsections (5), (6), and (7), respectively, and a new 589 subsection (4) is added to that section, to read: 590 332.0075âCommercial service airports; transparency and 591 accountability; penalty.â 592 (4)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, a 593 commercial service airport must develop a plan for obtaining and 594 maintaining critical infrastructure resources for the airport, 595 its tenants, and the traveling public. Such plans must include 596 long-term contracts and rights of first refusal regarding the 597 sale of and contingency plans for such resources. For purposes 598 of this subsection, the term âcritical infrastructure resourcesâ 599 includes, but is not limited to, access to electricity, fuel, 600 and water resources. 601 Section 19.âPresent subsections (1) through (37) of section 602 334.03, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (2) 603 through (38), respectively, a new subsection (1) is added to 604 that section, and present subsection (29) of that section is 605 amended, to read: 606 334.03âDefinitions.âWhen used in the Florida Transportation 607 Code, the term: 608 (1)ââAdvanced air mobility corridor connection pointâ means 609 any land area or transportation facility, including any 610 airspace, designated by the department as suitable to support 611 the efficient movement of people and goods by use as a 612 connection point for advanced air mobility. 613 (30)(29)ââTransportation corridorâ means any advanced air 614 mobility corridor connection point or any land area designated 615 by the state, a county, or a municipality which is between two 616 geographic points and which area is used or suitable for the 617 movement of people and goods by one or more modes of 618 transportation, including areas necessary for management of 619 access and securing applicable approvals and permits. 620 Transportation corridors, other than advanced air mobility 621 corridor connection points, shall contain, but are not limited 622 to, the following: 623 (a)âExisting publicly owned rights-of-way; 624 (b)âAll property or property interests necessary for future 625 transportation facilities, including rights of access, air, 626 view, and light, whether public or private, for the purpose of 627 securing and utilizing future transportation rights-of-way, 628 including, but not limited to, any lands reasonably necessary 629 now or in the future for securing applicable approvals and 630 permits, borrow pits, drainage ditches, water retention areas, 631 rest areas, replacement access for landowners whose access could 632 be impaired due to the construction of a future facility, and 633 replacement rights-of-way for relocation of rail and utility 634 facilities. 635 Section 20.âSubsections (5), (20), and (21) of section 636 334.044, Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsections (40) and 637 (41) are added to that section, to read: 638 334.044âPowers and duties of the department.âThe department 639 shall have the following general powers and duties: 640 (5)âTo purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire property and 641 materials, including the purchase of promotional items as part 642 of public information and education campaigns for the promotion 643 of environmental management, scenic highways, traffic and train 644 safety awareness, commercial motor vehicle safety, workforce 645 development, transportation-related economic development 646 opportunities, advanced air mobility electric vehicle use and 647 charging stations, autonomous vehicles, and context 648 classification for electric vehicles and autonomous vehicles; to 649 purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire equipment and supplies; 650 and to sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any property that 651 is no longer needed by the department. 652 (20)âTo operate and maintain designated research 653 facilities, to conduct and enter into contracts and agreements 654 for conducting research studies, and to collect data necessary 655 for the improvement of the state transportation system. 656 (21)âTo conduct and enter into contracts and agreements for 657 conducting research and demonstration projects relative to 658 innovative transportation technologies. 659 (40)âTo require local governments to submit applications 660 for federal funding for projects on state-owned rights-of-way, 661 roads, bridges, and limited access facilities to the department 662 for review and approval before submission of such applications 663 to the Federal Government. 664 (41)âNotwithstanding any other law, to acquire, own, 665 construct, or operate, or any combination thereof, one or more 666 airports as defined in s. 330.27 for the purpose of supporting 667 advanced air mobility. The acquisition of a publicly owned 668 airport by the department must be approved by the governing body 669 of the airport. The department may adopt rules to implement this 670 subsection. 671 Section 21.âSection 334.64, Florida Statutes, is created to 672 read: 673 334.64âDepartment to serve as primary point of contact for 674 LiDAR procurement.âNotwithstanding s. 20.255(9), the department 675 shall serve as the primary point of contact for statewide 676 topographic aerial LiDAR procurement and cost sharing related to 677 statewide geographic information systems and geospatial data 678 sharing. The department may provide these services to other 679 state and local governmental entities by entering into an 680 interagency agreement consistent with chapter 216. 681 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including any 682 charter, ordinance, statute, or special law, all state agencies 683 and local governmental entities conducting programs or 684 exercising powers relating to topographic aerial LiDAR mapping 685 are authorized to enter into an interagency agreement with the 686 department for the provision by the department of topographic 687 aerial LiDAR procurement and cost-sharing services, and to 688 delegate such authority to conduct programs or exercise powers 689 relating to topographic aerial LiDAR procurement and cost 690 sharing services to the department pursuant to such interagency 691 agreements. The department may adopt rules to implement this 692 section. 693 Section 22.âParagraphs (a) and (i) of subsection (3) and 694 paragraphs (b), (d), and (r) of subsection (7) of section 695 337.401, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 696 337.401âUse of right-of-way for utilities subject to 697 regulation; permit; fees.â 698 (3)(a)âBecause of the unique circumstances applicable to 699 providers of communications services, including, but not limited 700 to, the circumstances described in paragraph (e) and the fact 701 that federal and state law require the nondiscriminatory 702 treatment of providers of telecommunications services, and 703 because of the desire to promote competition among providers of 704 communications services, it is the intent of the Legislature 705 that municipalities and counties treat providers of 706 communications services in a nondiscriminatory and competitively 707 neutral manner when imposing rules or regulations governing the 708 placement or maintenance of communications facilities in the 709 public roads or rights-of-way. Rules or regulations imposed by a 710 municipality or county relating to providers of communications 711 services placing or maintaining communications facilities in its 712 roads or rights-of-way must be generally applicable to all 713 providers of communications services, taking into account the 714 distinct engineering, construction, operation, maintenance, 715 public works, and safety requirements of the providerâs 716 facilities, and, notwithstanding any other law, may not require 717 a provider of communications services to apply for or enter into 718 an individual license, franchise, or other agreement with the 719 municipality or county as a condition of placing or maintaining 720 communications facilities in its roads or rights-of-way. In 721 addition to other reasonable rules or regulations that a 722 municipality or county may adopt relating to the placement or 723 maintenance of communications facilities in its roads or rights 724 of-way under this subsection or subsection (7), a municipality 725 or county may require a provider of communications services that 726 places or seeks to place facilities in its roads or rights-of 727 way to register with the municipality or county. To register, a 728 provider of communications services may be required only to 729 provide its name; the name, address, and telephone number of a 730 contact person for the registrant; the number of the 731 registrantâs current certificate of authorization issued by the 732 Florida Public Service Commission, the Federal Communications 733 Commission, or the Department of State; a statement of whether 734 the registrant is a pass-through provider as defined in 735 subparagraph (6)(a)1.; the registrantâs federal employer 736 identification number; and any required proof of insurance or 737 self-insuring status adequate to defend and cover claims. A 738 municipality or county may not require a registrant to renew a 739 registration more frequently than every 5 years but may require 740 during this period that a registrant update the registration 741 information provided under this subsection within 90 days after 742 a change in such information. A municipality or county may not 743 require the registrant to provide an inventory of communications 744 facilities, maps, locations of such facilities, or other 745 information by a registrant as a condition of registration, 746 renewal, or for any other purpose; provided, however, that a 747 municipality or county may require as part of a permit 748 application that the applicant identify at-grade communications 749 facilities within 50 feet of the proposed installation location 750 for the placement of at-grade communications facilities. A 751 municipality or county may not require that a provider locate or 752 perform a survey of any facilities except its own or any right 753 of-way boundary when requesting a permit consistent with chapter 754 556. If the owner of a facility fails to locate their facilities 755 as required under chapter 556, a provider may proceed with the 756 work but must use reasonable care and detection equipment or 757 other acceptable means to avoid damaging existing underground 758 facilities. A municipality or county may not require a provider 759 to pay any fee, cost, or other charge for registration or 760 renewal thereof. A municipality or county may not limit the 761 number of permits in any way, including by project size or by 762 limiting the number of open permits or applications, provided 763 that the permit is closed out within 45 days after the 764 providerâs completion of work. A municipality or county may 765 require the submission or maintenance of a bond or other 766 financial instrument as set out in this section but may not 767 require a cash deposit or other escrow, payment, or exaction as 768 a condition of issuing a permit. It is the intent of the 769 Legislature that the placement, operation, maintenance, 770 upgrading, and extension of communications facilities not be 771 unreasonably interrupted or delayed through the permitting or 772 other local regulatory process. Except as provided in this 773 chapter or otherwise expressly authorized by chapter 202, 774 chapter 364, or chapter 610, a municipality or county may not 775 adopt or enforce any ordinance, regulation, or requirement as to 776 the placement or operation of communications facilities in a 777 right-of-way by a communications services provider authorized by 778 state or local law to operate in a right-of-way; regulate any 779 communications services; or impose or collect any tax, fee, 780 cost, charge, or exaction for the placement of communications 781 facilities or the provision of communications services over the 782 communications services providerâs communications facilities in 783 a right-of-way. 784 (i)âExcept as expressly provided in this section, this 785 section does not modify the authority of municipalities and 786 counties to levy the tax authorized in chapter 202 or the duties 787 of providers of communications services under ss. 337.402 788 337.404. This section does not apply to building permits, pole 789 attachments, or private roads, private easements, and private 790 rights-of-way, or building permits unrelated to the placement of 791 communications facilities. 792 (7) 793 (b)âAs used in subsections (3)-(9) this subsection, the 794 term: 795 1.ââAntennaâ means communications equipment that transmits 796 or receives electromagnetic radio frequency signals used in 797 providing wireless services. 798 2.ââApplicable codesâ means uniform building, fire, 799 electrical, plumbing, or mechanical codes adopted by a 800 recognized national code organization or local amendments to 801 those codes enacted solely to address threats of destruction of 802 property or injury to persons, and includes the National 803 Electric Safety Code and the 2017 edition of the Florida 804 Department of Transportation Utility Accommodation Manual. 805 3.ââApplicantâ means a person who submits an application 806 and is a wireless provider. 807 4.ââApplicationâ means a request submitted by an applicant 808 to an authority for a permit to collocate small wireless 809 facilities, or to place a new utility pole used to support a 810 small wireless facility, or place other communications 811 facilities. An authorityâs permit application form or process 812 must include all required permissions, however designated, 813 required by the authority to grant a permit to place 814 communications facilities, including, but not limited to, right 815 of-way occupancy, building permits, electrical permits, or 816 historic review. 817 5.ââAuthorityâ means a county or municipality having 818 jurisdiction and control of the rights-of-way of any public 819 road. The term does not include the Department of 820 Transportation. Rights-of-way under the jurisdiction and control 821 of the department are excluded from this subsection. 822 6.ââAuthority utility poleâ means a utility pole owned by 823 an authority in the right-of-way. The term does not include a 824 utility pole owned by a municipal electric utility, a utility 825 pole used to support municipally owned or operated electric 826 distribution facilities, or a utility pole located in the right 827 of-way within: 828 a.âA retirement community that: 829 (I)âIs deed restricted as housing for older persons as 830 defined in s. 760.29(4)(b); 831 (II)âHas more than 5,000 residents; and 832 (III)âHas underground utilities for electric transmission 833 or distribution. 834 b.âA municipality that: 835 (I)âIs located on a coastal barrier island as defined in s. 836 161.053(1)(b)3.; 837 (II)âHas a land area of less than 5 square miles; 838 (III)âHas less than 10,000 residents; and 839 (IV)âHas, before July 1, 2017, received referendum approval 840 to issue debt to finance municipal-wide undergrounding of its 841 utilities for electric transmission or distribution. 842 7.ââCollocateâ or âcollocationâ means to install, mount, 843 maintain, modify, operate, or replace one or more wireless 844 facilities on, under, within, or adjacent to a wireless support 845 structure or utility pole. The term does not include the 846 installation of a new utility pole or wireless support structure 847 in the public rights-of-way. 848 8.ââFCCâ means the Federal Communications Commission. 849 9.ââMicro wireless facilityâ means a small wireless 850 facility having dimensions no larger than 24 inches in length, 851 15 inches in width, and 12 inches in height and an exterior 852 antenna, if any, no longer than 11 inches. 853 10.ââSmall wireless facilityâ means a wireless facility 854 that meets the following qualifications: 855 a.âEach antenna associated with the facility is located 856 inside an enclosure of no more than 6 cubic feet in volume or, 857 in the case of antennas that have exposed elements, each antenna 858 and all of its exposed elements could fit within an enclosure of 859 no more than 6 cubic feet in volume; and 860 b.âAll other wireless equipment associated with the 861 facility is cumulatively no more than 28 cubic feet in volume. 862 The following types of associated ancillary equipment are not 863 included in the calculation of equipment volume: electric 864 meters, concealment elements, telecommunications demarcation 865 boxes, ground-based enclosures, grounding equipment, power 866 transfer switches, cutoff switches, vertical cable runs for the 867 connection of power and other services, and utility poles or 868 other support structures. 869 11.ââUtility poleâ means a pole or similar structure that 870 is used in whole or in part to provide communications services 871 or for electric distribution, lighting, traffic control, 872 signage, or a similar function. The term includes the vertical 873 support structure for traffic lights but does not include a 874 horizontal structure to which signal lights or other traffic 875 control devices are attached and does not include a pole or 876 similar structure 15 feet in height or less unless an authority 877 grants a waiver for such pole. 878 12.ââWireless facilityâ means equipment at a fixed location 879 which enables wireless communications between user equipment and 880 a communications network, including radio transceivers, 881 antennas, wires, coaxial or fiber-optic cable or other cables, 882 regular and backup power supplies, and comparable equipment, 883 regardless of technological configuration, and equipment 884 associated with wireless communications. The term includes small 885 wireless facilities. The term does not include: 886 a.âThe structure or improvements on, under, within, or 887 adjacent to the structure on which the equipment is collocated; 888 b.âWireline backhaul facilities; or 889 c.âCoaxial or fiber-optic cable that is between wireless 890 structures or utility poles or that is otherwise not immediately 891 adjacent to or directly associated with a particular antenna. 892 13.ââWireless infrastructure providerâ means a person who 893 has been certificated under chapter 364 to provide 894 telecommunications service or under chapter 610 to provide cable 895 or video services in this state, or that personâs affiliate, and 896 who builds or installs wireless communication transmission 897 equipment, wireless facilities, or wireless support structures 898 but is not a wireless services provider. 899 14.ââWireless providerâ means a wireless infrastructure 900 provider or a wireless services provider. 901 15.ââWireless servicesâ means any services provided using 902 licensed or unlicensed spectrum, whether at a fixed location or 903 mobile, using wireless facilities. 904 16.ââWireless services providerâ means a person who 905 provides wireless services. 906 17.ââWireless support structureâ means a freestanding 907 structure, such as a monopole, a guyed or self-supporting tower, 908 or another existing or proposed structure designed to support or 909 capable of supporting wireless facilities. The term does not 910 include a utility pole, pedestal, or other support structure for 911 ground-based equipment not mounted on a utility pole and less 912 than 5 feet in height. 913 (d)âAn authority may require a registration process and 914 permit fees in accordance with subsection (3). An authority 915 shall accept applications for permits and shall process and 916 issue permits subject to the following requirements: 917 1.âAn authority may not directly or indirectly require an 918 applicant to perform services unrelated to the collocation for 919 which approval is sought, such as in-kind contributions to the 920 authority, including reserving fiber, conduit, or pole space for 921 the authority. 922 2.âAn applicant may not be required to provide more 923 information to obtain a permit than is necessary to demonstrate 924 the applicantâs compliance with applicable codes for the 925 placement of small wireless facilities in the locations 926 identified in the application. An applicant may not be required 927 to provide inventories, maps, or locations of communications 928 facilities in the right-of-way other than as necessary to avoid 929 interference with other at-grade or aerial facilities located at 930 the specific location proposed for a small wireless facility or 931 within 50 feet of such location. 932 3.âAn authority may not: 933 a.âRequire the placement of small wireless facilities on 934 any specific utility pole or category of poles; 935 b.âRequire the placement of multiple antenna systems on a 936 single utility pole; 937 c.âRequire a demonstration that collocation of a small 938 wireless facility on an existing structure is not legally or 939 technically possible as a condition for granting a permit for 940 the collocation of a small wireless facility on a new utility 941 pole except as provided in paragraph (i); 942 d.âRequire compliance with an authorityâs provisions 943 regarding placement of communications facilities, including 944 small wireless facilities or a new utility poles pole used to 945 support a small wireless facilities, facility in rights-of-way 946 under the control of the department unless the authority has 947 received a delegation from the department for the location of 948 the small wireless facility or utility pole;, or require such 949 compliance as a condition to receive a permit that is ancillary 950 to the permit for collocation of a small wireless facility, 951 including an electrical permit; 952 e.âRequire a meeting before filing an application; 953 f.âRequire direct or indirect public notification or a 954 public meeting for the placement of communication facilities in 955 the right-of-way; 956 g.âLimit the size or configuration of a small wireless 957 facility or any of its components, if the small wireless 958 facility complies with the size limits in this subsection; 959 h.âProhibit the installation of a new utility pole used to 960 support the collocation of a small wireless facility if the 961 installation otherwise meets the requirements of this 962 subsection; or 963 i.âRequire that any component of a small wireless facility 964 be placed underground except as provided in paragraph (i); or 965 j.âRequire compliance with provisions regarding the 966 placement of communications facilities, including small wireless 967 facilities or new utility poles used to support small wireless 968 facilities, in rights-of-way not owned and controlled by the 969 authority and public utility easements that are within areas not 970 owned and controlled by the authority unless a permit delegation 971 agreement exists between the authority and the owner of the 972 right-of-way or area that contains the public utility easement. 973 4.âSubject to paragraph (r), an authority may not limit the 974 placement, by minimum separation distances, of small wireless 975 facilities, utility poles on which small wireless facilities are 976 or will be collocated, or other at-grade communications 977 facilities. However, within 14 days after the date of filing the 978 application, an authority may request that the proposed location 979 of a small wireless facility be moved to another location in the 980 right-of-way and placed on an alternative authority utility pole 981 or support structure or placed on a new utility pole. The 982 authority and the applicant may negotiate the alternative 983 location, including any objective design standards and 984 reasonable spacing requirements for ground-based equipment, for 985 30 days after the date of the request. At the conclusion of the 986 negotiation period, if the alternative location is accepted by 987 the applicant, the applicant must notify the authority of such 988 acceptance and the application shall be deemed granted for any 989 new location for which there is agreement and all other 990 locations in the application. If an agreement is not reached, 991 the applicant must notify the authority of such nonagreement and 992 the authority must grant or deny the original application within 993 90 days after the date the application was filed. A request for 994 an alternative location, an acceptance of an alternative 995 location, or a rejection of an alternative location must be in 996 writing and provided by electronic mail. 997 5.âAn authority shall limit the height of a small wireless 998 facility to 10 feet above the utility pole or structure upon 999 which the small wireless facility is to be collocated. Unless 1000 waived by an authority, the height for a new utility pole is 1001 limited to the tallest existing utility pole as of July 1, 2017, 1002 located in the same right-of-way, other than a utility pole for 1003 which a waiver has previously been granted, measured from grade 1004 in place within 500 feet of the proposed location of the small 1005 wireless facility. If there is no utility pole within 500 feet, 1006 the authority shall limit the height of the utility pole to 50 1007 feet. 1008 6.âThe installation by a communications services provider 1009 of a utility pole in the public rights-of-way, other than a 1010 utility pole used to support a small wireless facility, is 1011 subject to authority rules or regulations governing the 1012 placement of utility poles in the public rights-of-way. 1013 7.âWithin 14 days after receiving an application, an 1014 authority must determine and notify the applicant by electronic 1015 mail as to whether the application is complete. If an 1016 application is deemed incomplete, the authority must 1017 specifically identify the missing information. An application is 1018 deemed complete if the authority fails to provide notification 1019 to the applicant within 14 days. 1020 8.âAn application must be processed on a nondiscriminatory 1021 basis. A complete application is deemed approved if an authority 1022 fails to approve or deny the application within 60 days after 1023 receipt of the application. If an authority does not use the 30 1024 day negotiation period provided in subparagraph 4., the parties 1025 may mutually agree to extend the 60-day application review 1026 period. The authority shall grant or deny the application at the 1027 end of the extended period. A permit issued pursuant to an 1028 approved application shall remain effective for 1 year unless 1029 extended by the authority. 1030 9.âAn authority must notify the applicant of approval or 1031 denial by electronic mail. An authority shall approve a complete 1032 application unless it does not meet the authorityâs applicable 1033 codes. If the application is denied, the authority must specify 1034 in writing the basis for denial, including the specific code 1035 provisions on which the denial was based, and send the 1036 documentation to the applicant by electronic mail on the day the 1037 authority denies the application. The applicant may cure the 1038 deficiencies identified by the authority and resubmit the 1039 application within 30 days after notice of the denial is sent to 1040 the applicant. The authority shall approve or deny the revised 1041 application within 30 days after receipt or the application is 1042 deemed approved. The review of a revised application is limited 1043 to the deficiencies cited in the denial. If an authority 1044 provides for administrative review of the denial of an 1045 application, the review must be complete and a written decision 1046 issued within 45 days after a written request for review is 1047 made. A denial must identify the specific code provisions on 1048 which the denial is based. If the administrative review is not 1049 complete within 45 days, the authority waives any claim 1050 regarding failure to exhaust administrative remedies in any 1051 judicial review of the denial of an application. 1052 10.âAn applicant seeking to collocate small wireless 1053 facilities within the jurisdiction of a single authority may, at 1054 the applicantâs discretion, file a consolidated application and 1055 receive a single permit for the collocation of up to 30 small 1056 wireless facilities. If the application includes multiple small 1057 wireless facilities, an authority may separately address small 1058 wireless facility collocations for which incomplete information 1059 has been received or which are denied. 1060 11.âAn authority may deny an application to collocate a 1061 small wireless facility or place a utility pole used to support 1062 a small wireless facility in the public rights-of-way if the 1063 proposed small wireless facility or utility pole used to support 1064 a small wireless facility: 1065 a.âMaterially interferes with the safe operation of traffic 1066 control equipment. 1067 b.âMaterially interferes with sight lines or clear zones 1068 for transportation, pedestrians, or public safety purposes. 1069 c.âMaterially interferes with compliance with the Americans 1070 with Disabilities Act or similar federal or state standards 1071 regarding pedestrian access or movement. 1072 d.âMaterially fails to comply with the 2017 edition of the 1073 Florida Department of Transportation Utility Accommodation 1074 Manual. 1075 e.âFails to comply with applicable codes. 1076 f.âFails to comply with objective design standards 1077 authorized under paragraph (r). 1078 12.âAn authority may adopt by ordinance provisions for 1079 insurance coverage, indemnification, force majeure, abandonment, 1080 authority liability, or authority warranties. Such provisions 1081 must be reasonable and nondiscriminatory and apply to all 1082 providers of communications services, including, if applicable, 1083 any local government or nonprofit providers. An authority may 1084 require a construction bond to secure restoration of the 1085 postconstruction rights-of-way to the preconstruction condition. 1086 However, such bond must be time-limited to not more than 18 1087 months after the construction to which the bond applies is 1088 completed, and such bond must be reasonably related to the cost 1089 to secure restoration of the rights-of-way. An authority may not 1090 limit the number of permits allowed under the same bond. For any 1091 financial obligation required by an authority allowed under this 1092 section, the authority may not limit the number of permits in 1093 any way, including by project size or by limiting the number of 1094 applications or open permits, provided that the permit is closed 1095 out within 45 days after the providerâs completion of work; may 1096 not impose additional requirements based on the scope or linear 1097 feet of the project; and shall accept, at the option of the 1098 applicant, a bond or a letter of credit or similar financial 1099 instrument issued by any financial institution that is 1100 authorized to do business within the United States and, provided 1101 that a claim against the financial instrument may be made by 1102 electronic means, including by facsimile. An authority may not 1103 require a deposit or escrow of cash as a condition of issuing a 1104 permit or compel the applicant to agree to any additional terms 1105 or agreements not specifically authorized by this act or 1106 directly related to the work set out in the application. A 1107 provider of communications services may add an authority to any 1108 existing bond, insurance policy, or other relevant financial 1109 instrument, and the authority must accept such proof of coverage 1110 without any conditions other than consent to venue for purposes 1111 of any litigation to which the authority is a party. An 1112 authority may not require a communications services provider to 1113 indemnify it for liabilities not caused by the provider, its 1114 agents, or its employees, including liabilities arising from the 1115 authorityâs negligence, gross negligence, or willful conduct by 1116 an unaffiliated third party. 1117 13.âCollocation of a small wireless facility on an 1118 authority utility pole does not provide the basis for the 1119 imposition of an ad valorem tax on the authority utility pole. 1120 14.âAn authority may reserve space on authority utility 1121 poles for future public safety uses. However, a reservation of 1122 space may not preclude collocation of a small wireless facility. 1123 If replacement of the authority utility pole is necessary to 1124 accommodate the collocation of the small wireless facility and 1125 the future public safety use, the pole replacement is subject to 1126 make-ready provisions and the replaced pole shall accommodate 1127 the future public safety use. 1128 15.âA structure granted a permit and installed pursuant to 1129 this subsection shall comply with chapter 333 and federal 1130 regulations pertaining to airport airspace protections. 1131 (r)âAn authority may require wireless providers to comply 1132 with objective design standards adopted by ordinance. The 1133 ordinance may only require: 1134 1.âA new utility pole that replaces an existing utility 1135 pole to be of substantially similar design, material, and color; 1136 2.âReasonable spacing requirements concerning the location 1137 of a ground-mounted component of a small wireless facility which 1138 does not exceed 15 feet from the associated support structure; 1139 or 1140 3.âA small wireless facility to meet reasonable location 1141 context, color, camouflage, and concealment requirements, 1142 subject to the limitations in this subsection; and 1143 4.âA new utility pole used to support a small wireless 1144 facility to meet reasonable location context, color, and 1145 material of the predominant utility pole type at the proposed 1146 location of the new utility pole. 1147 1148 Such design standards under this paragraph may be waived by the 1149 authority upon a showing that the design standards are not 1150 reasonably compatible for the particular location of a small 1151 wireless facility or utility pole or are technically infeasible 1152 or that the design standards impose an excessive expense. The 1153 waiver must be granted or denied within 45 days after the date 1154 of the request. An authority may not require landscaping, 1155 landscaping maintenance, or vegetation management other than 1156 that necessary for right-of-way restoration. 1157 Section 23.âPresent paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 1158 (3) of section 338.231, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 1159 paragraphs (c) and (d), respectively, a new paragraph (b) is 1160 added to that subsection, and paragraph (a) of that subsection 1161 is amended, to read: 1162 338.231âTurnpike tolls, fixing; pledge of tolls and other 1163 revenues.âThe department shall at all times fix, adjust, charge, 1164 and collect such tolls and amounts for the use of the turnpike 1165 system as are required in order to provide a fund sufficient 1166 with other revenues of the turnpike system to pay the cost of 1167 maintaining, improving, repairing, and operating such turnpike 1168 system; to pay the principal of and interest on all bonds issued 1169 to finance or refinance any portion of the turnpike system as 1170 the same become due and payable; and to create reserves for all 1171 such purposes. 1172 (3)(a)1.âFor the period July 1, 1998, through June 30, 2029 1173 2027, the department shall, to the maximum extent feasible, 1174 program sufficient funds in the tentative work program such that 1175 the percentage of turnpike toll and bond financed commitments in 1176 Miami-Dade County, Broward County, and Palm Beach County as 1177 compared to total turnpike toll and bond financed commitments 1178 shall be at least 90 percent of the share of net toll 1179 collections attributable to users of the turnpike system in 1180 Miami-Dade County, Broward County, and Palm Beach County as 1181 compared to total net toll collections attributable to users of 1182 the turnpike system. 1183 2.âBeginning in the 2029-2030 fiscal year, the department 1184 shall, to the maximum extent feasible, program sufficient funds 1185 in the tentative work program such that 100 percent of the share 1186 of net toll collections attributable to users of the turnpike 1187 system in Miami-Dade County, Broward County, and Palm Beach 1188 County is used for turnpike toll and bond financed commitments 1189 in those counties. 1190 1191 This paragraph subsection does not apply when the application of 1192 such requirements would violate any covenant established in a 1193 resolution or trust indenture relating to the issuance of 1194 turnpike bonds. 1195 (b)âThe department may at any time for economic 1196 considerations establish lower temporary toll rates for a new or 1197 existing toll facility for a period not to exceed 1 year, after 1198 which the toll rates adopted pursuant to s. 120.54 shall become 1199 effective. 1200 Section 24.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) and paragraph 1201 (d) of subsection (5) of section 339.81, Florida Statutes, are 1202 amended to read: 1203 339.81âFlorida Shared-Use Nonmotorized Trail Network.â 1204 (2) 1205 (b)âThe multiuse trails or shared-use paths of the 1206 statewide network must be physically separated from motor 1207 vehicle traffic and constructed with asphalt, concrete, or 1208 another improved hard surface approved by the department. 1209 (5) 1210 (d)âTo the greatest extent practicable, the department 1211 shall program projects in the work program to plan for 1212 development of the entire trail and to minimize the creation of 1213 gaps between trail segments. The department shall, at a minimum, 1214 ensure that local support exists for projects and trail 1215 segments, including the availability or dedication of local 1216 funding sources and of contributions by private landowners who 1217 agree to make their land, or property interests in such land, 1218 available for public use as a trail. The department may also 1219 consider any sponsorship agreement entered into pursuant to 1220 subsection (7). 1221 Section 25.âSubsection (16) of section 341.041, Florida 1222 Statutes, is amended to read: 1223 341.041âTransit responsibilities of the department.âThe 1224 department shall, within the resources provided pursuant to 1225 chapter 216: 1226 (16)âUnless otherwise provided by state or federal law, 1227 ensure that all grants and agreements between the department and 1228 entities providing paratransit services to persons with 1229 disabilities include, at a minimum, the following provisions: 1230 (a)âPerformance requirements for the delivery of services, 1231 including clear penalties for repeated or continuing violations; 1232 (b)âMinimum liability insurance requirements for all 1233 transportation services purchased, provided, or coordinated for 1234 the transportation disadvantaged, as defined in s. 427.011(1), 1235 through the contracted vendor or subcontractor thereof; 1236 (c)âComplaint and grievance processes for users of 1237 paratransit services for persons with disabilities users, 1238 including a requirement that all reported complaints, 1239 grievances, and resolutions be reported to the department on a 1240 quarterly basis; and 1241 (d)âA requirement that the provisions of paragraphs (a), 1242 (b), and (c) must be included in any agreement between an entity 1243 receiving a grant or an agreement from the department and such 1244 entityâs contractors or subcontractors that provide paratransit 1245 services for persons with disabilities. 1246 Section 26.âSection 479.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1247 read: 1248 479.25âErection of noise-attenuation barrier or obstruction 1249 blocking view of sign; procedures; application.â 1250 (1)âThe owner of a lawfully erected sign that is governed 1251 by and conforms to state and federal requirements for land use, 1252 size, height, and spacing may increase the height above ground 1253 level of such sign at its permitted location if a noise 1254 attenuation barrier, ramp, or braided bridge is permitted by or 1255 erected by any governmental entity in such a way as to screen or 1256 block visibility of the sign. Any increase in height permitted 1257 under this section may only be the increase in height which is 1258 required to achieve the same degree of visibility from the 1259 right-of-way which the sign had before the construction of the 1260 noise-attenuation barrier, ramp, or braided bridge, 1261 notwithstanding the restrictions contained in s. 479.07(9)(b). A 1262 sign reconstructed under this section must comply with the 1263 building standards and wind load requirements provided in the 1264 Florida Building Code. If construction of a proposed noise 1265 attenuation barrier, ramp, or braided bridge will screen a sign 1266 lawfully permitted under this chapter, the department shall 1267 provide notice to the local government or local jurisdiction 1268 within which the sign is located before construction. Upon a 1269 determination that an increase in the height of a sign as 1270 permitted under this section will violate an ordinance or a land 1271 development regulation of the local government or local 1272 jurisdiction, the local government or local jurisdiction shall, 1273 before construction: 1274 (a)âProvide a variance or waiver to the local ordinance or 1275 land development regulations to allow an increase in the height 1276 of the sign; 1277 (b)âAllow the sign to be relocated or reconstructed at 1278 another location if the sign owner agrees; or 1279 (c)âPay the fair market value of the sign and its 1280 associated interest in the real property. 1281 (2)âThe department shall hold a public hearing within the 1282 boundaries of the affected local governments or local 1283 jurisdictions to receive input on the proposed noise-attenuation 1284 barrier, ramp, or braided bridge and its conflict with the local 1285 ordinance or land development regulation and to suggest or 1286 consider alternatives or modifications to alleviate or minimize 1287 the conflict with the local ordinance or land development 1288 regulation or minimize any costs that may be associated with 1289 relocating, reconstructing, or paying for the affected sign. The 1290 public hearing may be held concurrently with other public 1291 hearings scheduled for the project. The department shall provide 1292 a written notification to the local government or local 1293 jurisdiction of the date and time of the public hearing and 1294 shall provide general notice of the public hearing in accordance 1295 with the notice provisions of s. 335.02(1). The notice may not 1296 be placed in that portion of a newspaper in which legal notices 1297 or classified advertisements appear. The notice must 1298 specifically state that: 1299 (a)âErection of the proposed noise-attenuation barrier, 1300 ramp, or braided bridge may block the visibility of an existing 1301 outdoor advertising sign; 1302 (b)âThe local government or local jurisdiction may restrict 1303 or prohibit increasing the height of the existing outdoor 1304 advertising sign; and 1305 (c)âUpon construction of the noise-attenuation barrier, 1306 ramp, or braided bridge, the local government or local 1307 jurisdiction shall: 1308 1.âAllow an increase in the height of the sign through a 1309 waiver or variance to a local ordinance or land development 1310 regulation; 1311 2.âAllow the sign to be relocated or reconstructed at 1312 another location if the sign owner agrees; or 1313 3.âPay the fair market value of the sign and its associated 1314 interest in the real property. 1315 (3)âThe department may not permit erection of the noise 1316 attenuation barrier, ramp, or braided bridge to the extent the 1317 barrier or obstruction screens or blocks visibility of the sign 1318 until after the public hearing is held. 1319 (4)âThis section does not apply to any existing written 1320 agreement executed before July 1, 2006, between any local 1321 government and the owner of an outdoor advertising sign. 1322 Section 27.âSection 790.19, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1323 read: 1324 790.19âShooting into or throwing deadly missiles into 1325 dwellings, public or private buildings, occupied or not 1326 occupied; vessels, aircraft, buses, railroad cars, streetcars, 1327 or other vehicles.âA person who Whoever, wantonly or 1328 maliciously, shoots at, within, or into, or throws a any missile 1329 or hurls or projects a stone or other hard substance which would 1330 produce death or great bodily harm, at, within, or in a any 1331 public or private building, occupied or unoccupied; a, or public 1332 or private bus or a any train, locomotive, railway car, caboose, 1333 cable railway car, street railway car, monorail car, or vehicle 1334 of any kind which is being used or occupied by a any person; an 1335 autonomous vehicle, occupied or unoccupied; a, or any boat, 1336 vessel, ship, or barge lying in or plying the waters of this 1337 state;, or an aircraft flying through the airspace of this state 1338 commits shall be guilty of a felony of the second degree, 1339 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 1340 Section 28.âPresent subsections (8) through (12) of section 1341 806.13, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (9) 1342 through (13), respectively, a new subsection (8) is added to 1343 that section, and present subsection (11) of that section is 1344 amended, to read: 1345 806.13âCriminal mischief; penalties; penalty for minor.â 1346 (8)âA person who willfully or maliciously defaces, injures, 1347 or damages by any means an autonomous vehicle as defined in s. 1348 316.003(3)(a) commits a felony of the third degree, punishable 1349 as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, if the 1350 damage to the vehicle is greater than $1,000. 1351 (12)(11)âA minor whose driver license or driving privilege 1352 is revoked, suspended, or withheld under subsection (11) (10) 1353 may elect to reduce the period of revocation, suspension, or 1354 withholding by performing community service at the rate of 1 day 1355 for each hour of community service performed. In addition, if 1356 the court determines that due to a family hardship, the minorâs 1357 driver license or driving privilege is necessary for employment 1358 or medical purposes of the minor or a member of the minorâs 1359 family, the court shall order the minor to perform community 1360 service and reduce the period of revocation, suspension, or 1361 withholding at the rate of 1 day for each hour of community 1362 service performed. As used in this subsection, the term 1363 âcommunity serviceâ means cleaning graffiti from public 1364 property. 1365 Section 29.âSection 8 of chapter 2006-316, Laws of Florida, 1366 is amended to read: 1367 Section 8.âSenator N. Ray Carroll Memorial Interchange 1368 designated; Department of Transportation to erect suitable 1369 markers.â 1370 (1)âUpon completion of construction, the New Nolte Road 1371 Interchange The Florida Turnpike interchange being constructed 1372 at Milepost 240 and Kissimmee Park Road in Osceola County is 1373 designated as âSenator N. Ray Carroll Memorial Interchange.â 1374 (2)âThe Department of Transportation is directed to erect 1375 suitable markers designating Senator N. Ray Carroll Memorial 1376 Interchange as described in subsection (1). 1377 Section 30.âThe Department of Transportation shall conduct 1378 a study to evaluate the long-term impact of alternative fuel 1379 vehicles on state transportation revenues and identify potential 1380 policy options to address projected revenue reductions. 1381 (1)âThe study must: 1382 (a)âIdentify the projected impact of specific alternative 1383 fuel vehicle types and the corresponding projected impact on 1384 state transportation revenues. 1385 (b)âEvaluate new transportation revenue models, including, 1386 but not limited to, alternative fuel vehicle-specific 1387 registration fees and taxes; technological and industry 1388 partnerships that could facilitate fees based on miles-per 1389 gallon usage equivalences; and revenue models that are based on 1390 vehicle miles-based taxes. 1391 (c)âAnalyze the advantages, disadvantages, and projected 1392 revenue impacts from each transportation revenue model. 1393 (2)âBy January 1, 2027, the department shall submit a 1394 report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 1395 Speaker of the House of Representatives providing the results of 1396 the study. 1397 Section 31.âFor the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of 1398 $300,000 in nonrecurring funds is appropriated from the State 1399 Transportation Trust Fund to the Department of Transportation 1400 for the purpose of studying alternative fuel vehicles and 1401 methods to receive transportation revenues from users of such 1402 vehicles. 1403 Section 32.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 1404 311.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1405 311.07âFlorida seaport transportation and economic 1406 development funding.â 1407 (3) 1408 (b)âProjects eligible for funding by grants under the 1409 program are limited to the following port facilities or port 1410 transportation projects: 1411 1.âTransportation facilities within the jurisdiction of the 1412 port. 1413 2.âThe dredging or deepening of channels, turning basins, 1414 or harbors. 1415 3.âThe construction or rehabilitation of wharves, docks, 1416 structures, jetties, piers, storage facilities, cruise 1417 terminals, automated people mover systems, or any facilities 1418 necessary or useful in connection with any of the foregoing. 1419 4.âThe acquisition of vessel tracking systems, container 1420 cranes, or other mechanized equipment used in the movement of 1421 cargo or passengers in international commerce. 1422 5.âThe acquisition of land to be used for port purposes. 1423 6.âThe acquisition, improvement, enlargement, or extension 1424 of existing port facilities. 1425 7.âEnvironmental protection projects which are necessary 1426 because of requirements imposed by a state agency as a condition 1427 of a permit or other form of state approval; which are necessary 1428 for environmental mitigation required as a condition of a state, 1429 federal, or local environmental permit; which are necessary for 1430 the acquisition of spoil disposal sites and improvements to 1431 existing and future spoil sites; or which result from the 1432 funding of eligible projects listed in this paragraph. 1433 8.âTransportation facilities as defined in s. 334.03 s. 1434 334.03(30) which are not otherwise part of the Department of 1435 Transportationâs adopted work program. 1436 9.âIntermodal access projects. 1437 10.âConstruction or rehabilitation of port facilities as 1438 defined in s. 315.02, excluding any park or recreational 1439 facilities, in ports listed in s. 311.09(1) with operating 1440 revenues of $5 million or less, provided that such projects 1441 create economic development opportunities, capital improvements, 1442 and positive financial returns to such ports. 1443 11.âSeaport master plan or strategic plan development or 1444 updates, including the purchase of data to support such plans. 1445 12.âSpaceport or space industry-related planning or 1446 construction of facilities on seaport property which are 1447 necessary or useful for advancing the space industry in this 1448 state and provide an economic benefit to this state. 1449 13.âCommercial shipbuilding and manufacturing facilities on 1450 seaport property, if such projects provide an economic benefit 1451 to the community in which the seaport is located. 1452 Section 33.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 1453 316.0777, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1454 316.0777âAutomated license plate recognition systems; 1455 installation within rights-of-way of State Highway System; 1456 public records exemption.â 1457 (2) 1458 (b)âAt the discretion of the Department of Transportation, 1459 an automated license plate recognition system may be installed 1460 within the right-of-way, as defined in s. 334.03 s. 334.03(21), 1461 of a road on the State Highway System when installed at the 1462 request of a law enforcement agency for the purpose of 1463 collecting active criminal intelligence information or active 1464 criminal investigative information as defined in s. 119.011(3). 1465 An automated license plate recognition system may not be used to 1466 issue a notice of violation for a traffic infraction or a 1467 uniform traffic citation. Such installation must be in 1468 accordance with placement and installation guidelines developed 1469 by the Department of Transportation. An automated license plate 1470 recognition system must be removed within 30 days after the 1471 Department of Transportation notifies the requesting law 1472 enforcement agency that such removal must occur. 1473 Section 34.âParagraph (c) of subsection (5) of section 1474 316.515, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1475 316.515âMaximum width, height, length.â 1476 (5)âIMPLEMENTS OF HUSBANDRY AND FARM EQUIPMENT; 1477 AGRICULTURAL TRAILERS; FORESTRY EQUIPMENT; SAFETY REQUIREMENTS.â 1478 (c)âThe width and height limitations of this section do not 1479 apply to farming or agricultural equipment, whether self 1480 propelled, pulled, or hauled, when temporarily operated during 1481 daylight hours upon a public road that is not a limited access 1482 facility as defined in s. 334.03 s. 334.03(12), and the width 1483 and height limitations may be exceeded by such equipment without 1484 a permit. To be eligible for this exemption, the equipment shall 1485 be operated within a radius of 50 miles of the real property 1486 owned, rented, managed, harvested, or leased by the equipment 1487 owner. However, equipment being delivered by a dealer to a 1488 purchaser is not subject to the 50-mile limitation. Farming or 1489 agricultural equipment greater than 174 inches in width must 1490 have one warning lamp mounted on each side of the equipment to 1491 denote the width and must have a slow-moving vehicle sign. 1492 Warning lamps required by this paragraph must be visible from 1493 the front and rear of the vehicle and must be visible from a 1494 distance of at least 1,000 feet. 1495 Section 35.âSection 336.01, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1496 read: 1497 336.01âDesignation of county road system.âThe county road 1498 system shall be as defined in s. 334.03 s. 334.03(8). 1499 Section 36.âSubsection (2) of section 338.222, Florida 1500 Statutes, is amended to read: 1501 338.222âDepartment of Transportation sole governmental 1502 entity to acquire, construct, or operate turnpike projects; 1503 exception.â 1504 (2)âThe department may, but is not required to, contract 1505 with any local governmental entity as defined in s. 334.03 s. 1506 334.03(13) for the design, right-of-way acquisition, transfer, 1507 purchase, sale, acquisition, or other conveyance of the 1508 ownership, operation, maintenance, or construction of any 1509 turnpike project which the Legislature has approved. Local 1510 governmental entities may negotiate and contract with the 1511 department for the design, right-of-way acquisition, transfer, 1512 purchase, sale, acquisition, or other conveyance of the 1513 ownership, operation, maintenance, or construction of any 1514 section of the turnpike project within areas of their respective 1515 jurisdictions or within counties with which they have interlocal 1516 agreements. 1517 Section 37.âSubsection (2) of section 341.8225, Florida 1518 Statutes, is amended to read: 1519 341.8225âDepartment of Transportation sole governmental 1520 entity to acquire, construct, or operate high-speed rail 1521 projects; exception.â 1522 (2)âLocal governmental entities, as defined in s. 334.03 s. 1523 334.03(13), may negotiate with the department for the design, 1524 right-of-way acquisition, and construction of any component of 1525 the high-speed rail system within areas of their respective 1526 jurisdictions or within counties with which they have interlocal 1527 agreements. 1528 Section 38.âParagraph (b) of subsection (12) of section 1529 376.3071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1530 376.3071âInland Protection Trust Fund; creation; purposes; 1531 funding.â 1532 (12)âSITE CLEANUP.â 1533 (b)âLow-scored site initiative.âNotwithstanding subsections 1534 (5) and (6), a site with a priority ranking score of 29 points 1535 or less may voluntarily participate in the low-scored site 1536 initiative regardless of whether the site is eligible for state 1537 restoration funding. 1538 1.âTo participate in the low-scored site initiative, the 1539 property owner, or a responsible party who provides evidence of 1540 authorization from the property owner, must submit a âNo Further 1541 Actionâ proposal and affirmatively demonstrate that the 1542 conditions imposed under subparagraph 4. are met. 1543 2.âUpon affirmative demonstration that the conditions 1544 imposed under subparagraph 4. are met, the department shall 1545 issue a site rehabilitation completion order incorporating the 1546 âNo Further Actionâ proposal submitted by the property owner or 1547 the responsible party, who must provide evidence of 1548 authorization from the property owner. If no contamination is 1549 detected, the department may issue a site rehabilitation 1550 completion order. 1551 3.âSites that are eligible for state restoration funding 1552 may receive payment of costs for the low-scored site initiative 1553 as follows: 1554 a.âA property owner, or a responsible party who provides 1555 evidence of authorization from the property owner, may submit an 1556 assessment and limited remediation plan designed to 1557 affirmatively demonstrate that the site meets the conditions 1558 imposed under subparagraph 4. Notwithstanding the priority 1559 ranking score of the site, the department may approve the cost 1560 of the assessment and limited remediation, including up to 12 1561 months of groundwater monitoring and 12 months of limited 1562 remediation activities in one or more task assignments or 1563 modifications thereof, not to exceed the threshold amount 1564 provided in s. 287.017 for CATEGORY TWO, for each site where the 1565 department has determined that the assessment and limited 1566 remediation, if applicable, will likely result in a 1567 determination of âNo Further Action.â The department may not pay 1568 the costs associated with the establishment of institutional or 1569 engineering controls other than the costs associated with a 1570 professional land survey or a specific purpose survey, if such 1571 is needed, and the costs associated with obtaining a title 1572 report and paying recording fees. 1573 b.âAfter the approval of initial site assessment results 1574 provided pursuant to state funding under sub-subparagraph a., 1575 the department may approve an additional amount not to exceed 1576 the threshold amount provided in s. 287.017 for CATEGORY TWO for 1577 limited remediation needed to achieve a determination of âNo 1578 Further Action.â 1579 c.âThe assessment and limited remediation work shall be 1580 completed no later than 15 months after the department 1581 authorizes the start of a state-funded, low-score site 1582 initiative task. If groundwater monitoring is required after the 1583 assessment and limited remediation in order to satisfy the 1584 conditions under subparagraph 4., the department may authorize 1585 an additional 12 months to complete the monitoring. 1586 d.âNo more than $15 million for the low-scored site 1587 initiative may be encumbered from the fund in any fiscal year. 1588 Funds shall be made available on a first-come, first-served 1589 basis and shall be limited to 10 sites in each fiscal year for 1590 each property owner or each responsible party who provides 1591 evidence of authorization from the property owner. 1592 e.âProgram deductibles, copayments, and the limited 1593 contamination assessment report requirements under paragraph 1594 (13)(d) do not apply to expenditures under this paragraph. 1595 4.âThe department shall issue an order incorporating the 1596 âNo Further Actionâ proposal submitted by a property owner or a 1597 responsible party who provides evidence of authorization from 1598 the property owner upon affirmative demonstration that all of 1599 the following conditions are met: 1600 a.âSoil saturated with petroleum or petroleum products, or 1601 soil that causes a total corrected hydrocarbon measurement of 1602 500 parts per million or higher for the Gasoline Analytical 1603 Group or 50 parts per million or higher for the Kerosene 1604 Analytical Group, as defined by department rule, does not exist 1605 onsite as a result of a release of petroleum products. 1606 b.âA minimum of 12 months of groundwater monitoring 1607 indicates that the plume is shrinking or stable. 1608 c.âThe release of petroleum products at the site does not 1609 adversely affect adjacent surface waters, including their 1610 effects on human health and the environment. 1611 d.âThe area containing the petroleum productsâ chemicals of 1612 concern: 1613 (I)âIs confined to the source property boundaries of the 1614 real property on which the discharge originated, unless the 1615 property owner has requested or authorized a more limited area 1616 in the âNo Further Actionâ proposal submitted under this 1617 subsection; or 1618 (II)âHas migrated from the source property onto or beneath 1619 a transportation facility as defined in s. 334.03 s. 334.03(30) 1620 for which the department has approved, and the governmental 1621 entity owning the transportation facility has agreed to 1622 institutional controls as defined in s. 376.301(21). This sub 1623 sub-subparagraph does not, however, impose any legal liability 1624 on the transportation facility owner, obligate such owner to 1625 engage in remediation, or waive such ownerâs right to recover 1626 costs for damages. 1627 e.âThe groundwater contamination containing the petroleum 1628 productsâ chemicals of concern is not a threat to any permitted 1629 potable water supply well. 1630 f.âSoils onsite found between land surface and 2 feet below 1631 land surface which are subject to human exposure meet the soil 1632 cleanup target levels established in subparagraph (5)(b)9., or 1633 human exposure is limited by appropriate institutional or 1634 engineering controls. 1635 1636 Issuance of a site rehabilitation completion order under this 1637 paragraph acknowledges that minimal contamination exists onsite 1638 and that such contamination is not a threat to the public 1639 health, safety, or welfare; water resources; or the environment. 1640 Pursuant to subsection (4), the issuance of the site 1641 rehabilitation completion order, with or without conditions, 1642 does not alter eligibility for state-funded rehabilitation that 1643 would otherwise be applicable under this section. 1644 Section 39.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 1645 403.7211, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1646 403.7211âHazardous waste facilities managing hazardous 1647 wastes generated offsite; federal facilities managing hazardous 1648 waste.â 1649 (2)âThe department may not issue any permit under s. 1650 403.722 for the construction, initial operation, or substantial 1651 modification of a facility for the disposal, storage, or 1652 treatment of hazardous waste generated offsite which is proposed 1653 to be located in any of the following locations: 1654 (a)âAny area where life-threatening concentrations of 1655 hazardous substances could accumulate at any residence or 1656 residential subdivision as the result of a catastrophic event at 1657 the proposed facility, unless each such residence or residential 1658 subdivision is served by at least one arterial road or urban 1659 minor arterial road, as determined under the procedures 1660 referenced in s. 334.03 s. 334.03(10), which provides safe and 1661 direct egress by land to an area where such life-threatening 1662 concentrations of hazardous substances could not accumulate in a 1663 catastrophic event. Egress by any road leading from any 1664 residence or residential subdivision to any point located within 1665 1,000 yards of the proposed facility is unsafe for the purposes 1666 of this paragraph. In determining whether egress proposed by the 1667 applicant is safe and direct, the department shall also 1668 consider, at a minimum, the following factors: 1669 1.âNatural barriers such as water bodies, and whether any 1670 road in the proposed evacuation route is impaired by a natural 1671 barrier such as a water body. 1672 2.âPotential exposure during egress and potential increases 1673 in the duration of exposure. 1674 3.âWhether any road in a proposed evacuation route passes 1675 in close proximity to the facility. 1676 4.âWhether any portion of the evacuation route is 1677 inherently directed toward the facility. 1678 1679 For the purposes of this subsection, all distances shall be 1680 measured from the outer limit of the active hazardous waste 1681 management area. âSubstantial modificationâ includes: any 1682 physical change in, change in the operations of, or addition to 1683 a facility which could increase the potential offsite impact, or 1684 risk of impact, from a release at that facility; and any change 1685 in permit conditions which is reasonably expected to lead to 1686 greater potential impacts or risks of impacts, from a release at 1687 that facility. âSubstantial modificationâ does not include a 1688 change in operations, structures, or permit conditions which 1689 does not substantially increase either the potential impact 1690 from, or the risk of, a release. Physical or operational changes 1691 to a facility related solely to the management of nonhazardous 1692 waste at the facility is not considered a substantial 1693 modification. The department shall, by rule, adopt criteria to 1694 determine whether a facility has been substantially modified. 1695 âInitial operationâ means the initial commencement of operations 1696 at the facility. 1697 Section 40.âSubsection (5) of section 479.261, Florida 1698 Statutes, is amended to read: 1699 479.261âLogo sign program.â 1700 (5)âAt a minimum, permit fees for businesses that 1701 participate in the program must be established in an amount 1702 sufficient to offset the total cost to the department for the 1703 program, including contract costs. The department shall provide 1704 the services in the most efficient and cost-effective manner 1705 through department staff or by contracting for some or all of 1706 the services. The department shall adopt rules that set 1707 reasonable rates based upon factors such as population, traffic 1708 volume, market demand, and costs for annual permit fees. 1709 However, annual permit fees for sign locations inside an urban 1710 area, as defined in s. 334.03 s. 334.03(31), may not exceed 1711 $3,500, and annual permit fees for sign locations outside an 1712 urban area, as defined in s. 334.03 s. 334.03(31), may not 1713 exceed $2,000. After recovering program costs, the proceeds from 1714 the annual permit fees shall be deposited into the State 1715 Transportation Trust Fund and used for transportation purposes. 1716 Section 41.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 1717 715.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1718 715.07âVehicles or vessels parked on private property; 1719 towing.â 1720 (2)âThe owner or lessee of real property, or any person 1721 authorized by the owner or lessee, which person may be the 1722 designated representative of the condominium association if the 1723 real property is a condominium, may cause any vehicle or vessel 1724 parked on such property without her or his permission to be 1725 removed by a person regularly engaged in the business of towing 1726 vehicles or vessels, without liability for the costs of removal, 1727 transportation, or storage or damages caused by such removal, 1728 transportation, or storage, under any of the following 1729 circumstances: 1730 (a)âThe towing or removal of any vehicle or vessel from 1731 private property without the consent of the registered owner or 1732 other legally authorized person in control of that vehicle or 1733 vessel is subject to substantial compliance with the following 1734 conditions and restrictions: 1735 1.a.âAny towed or removed vehicle or vessel must be stored 1736 at a site within a 10-mile radius of the point of removal in any 1737 county of 500,000 population or more, and within a 15-mile 1738 radius of the point of removal in any county of fewer than 1739 500,000 population. That site must be open for the purpose of 1740 redemption of vehicles on any day that the person or firm towing 1741 such vehicle or vessel is open for towing purposes, from 8:00 1742 a.m. to 6:00 p.m., and, when closed, shall have prominently 1743 posted a sign indicating a telephone number where the operator 1744 of the site can be reached at all times. Upon receipt of a 1745 telephoned request to open the site to redeem a vehicle or 1746 vessel, the operator shall return to the site within 1 hour or 1747 she or he will be in violation of this section. 1748 b.âIf no towing business providing such service is located 1749 within the area of towing limitations set forth in sub 1750 subparagraph a., the following limitations apply: any towed or 1751 removed vehicle or vessel must be stored at a site within a 20 1752 mile radius of the point of removal in any county of 500,000 1753 population or more, and within a 30-mile radius of the point of 1754 removal in any county of fewer than 500,000 population. 1755 2.âThe person or firm towing or removing the vehicle or 1756 vessel shall, within 30 minutes after completion of such towing 1757 or removal, notify the municipal police department or, in an 1758 unincorporated area, the sheriff, of such towing or removal, the 1759 storage site, the time the vehicle or vessel was towed or 1760 removed, and the make, model, color, and license plate number of 1761 the vehicle or description and registration number of the vessel 1762 and shall obtain the name of the person at that department to 1763 whom such information was reported and note that name on the 1764 trip record. 1765 3.âA person in the process of towing or removing a vehicle 1766 or vessel from the premises or parking lot in which the vehicle 1767 or vessel is not lawfully parked must stop when a person seeks 1768 the return of the vehicle or vessel. The vehicle or vessel must 1769 be returned upon the payment of a reasonable service fee of not 1770 more than one-half of the posted rate for the towing or removal 1771 service as provided in subparagraph 6. The vehicle or vessel may 1772 be towed or removed if, after a reasonable opportunity, the 1773 owner or legally authorized person in control of the vehicle or 1774 vessel is unable to pay the service fee. If the vehicle or 1775 vessel is redeemed, a detailed signed receipt must be given to 1776 the person redeeming the vehicle or vessel. 1777 4.âA person may not pay or accept money or other valuable 1778 consideration for the privilege of towing or removing vehicles 1779 or vessels from a particular location. 1780 5.âExcept for property appurtenant to and obviously a part 1781 of a single-family residence, and except for instances when 1782 notice is personally given to the owner or other legally 1783 authorized person in control of the vehicle or vessel that the 1784 area in which that vehicle or vessel is parked is reserved or 1785 otherwise unavailable for unauthorized vehicles or vessels and 1786 that the vehicle or vessel is subject to being removed at the 1787 ownerâs or operatorâs expense, any property owner or lessee, or 1788 person authorized by the property owner or lessee, before towing 1789 or removing any vehicle or vessel from private property without 1790 the consent of the owner or other legally authorized person in 1791 control of that vehicle or vessel, must post a notice meeting 1792 the following requirements: 1793 a.âThe notice must be prominently placed at each driveway 1794 access or curb cut allowing vehicular access to the property 1795 within 10 feet from the road, as defined in s. 334.03 s. 1796 334.03(22). If there are no curbs or access barriers, the signs 1797 must be posted not fewer than one sign for each 25 feet of lot 1798 frontage. 1799 b.âThe notice must clearly indicate, in not fewer than 2 1800 inch high, light-reflective letters on a contrasting background, 1801 that unauthorized vehicles will be towed away at the ownerâs 1802 expense. The words âtow-away zoneâ must be included on the sign 1803 in not fewer than 4-inch high letters. 1804 c.âThe notice must also provide the name and current 1805 telephone number of the person or firm towing or removing the 1806 vehicles or vessels. 1807 d.âThe sign structure containing the required notices must 1808 be permanently installed with the words âtow-away zoneâ not 1809 fewer than 3 feet and not more than 6 feet above ground level 1810 and must be continuously maintained on the property for not 1811 fewer than 24 hours before the towing or removal of any vehicles 1812 or vessels. 1813 e.âThe local government may require permitting and 1814 inspection of these signs before any towing or removal of 1815 vehicles or vessels being authorized. 1816 f.âA business with 20 or fewer parking spaces satisfies the 1817 notice requirements of this subparagraph by prominently 1818 displaying a sign stating âReserved Parking for Customers Only 1819 Unauthorized Vehicles or Vessels Will be Towed Away At the 1820 Ownerâs Expenseâ in not fewer than 4-inch high, light-reflective 1821 letters on a contrasting background. 1822 g.âA property owner towing or removing vessels from real 1823 property must post notice, consistent with the requirements in 1824 sub-subparagraphs a.-f., which apply to vehicles, that 1825 unauthorized vehicles or vessels will be towed away at the 1826 ownerâs expense. 1827 1828 A business owner or lessee may authorize the removal of a 1829 vehicle or vessel by a towing company when the vehicle or vessel 1830 is parked in such a manner that restricts the normal operation 1831 of business; and if a vehicle or vessel parked on a public 1832 right-of-way obstructs access to a private driveway the owner, 1833 lessee, or agent may have the vehicle or vessel removed by a 1834 towing company upon signing an order that the vehicle or vessel 1835 be removed without a posted tow-away zone sign. 1836 6.âAny person or firm that tows or removes vehicles or 1837 vessels and proposes to require an owner, operator, or person in 1838 control or custody of a vehicle or vessel to pay the costs of 1839 towing and storage before redemption of the vehicle or vessel 1840 must file and keep on record with the local law enforcement 1841 agency a complete copy of the current rates to be charged for 1842 such services and post at the storage site an identical rate 1843 schedule and any written contracts with property owners, 1844 lessees, or persons in control of property which authorize such 1845 person or firm to remove vehicles or vessels as provided in this 1846 section. 1847 7.âAny person or firm towing or removing any vehicles or 1848 vessels from private property without the consent of the owner 1849 or other legally authorized person in control or custody of the 1850 vehicles or vessels shall, on any trucks, wreckers as defined in 1851 s. 713.78(1), or other vehicles used in the towing or removal, 1852 have the name, address, and telephone number of the company 1853 performing such service clearly printed in contrasting colors on 1854 the driver and passenger sides of the vehicle. The name shall be 1855 in at least 3-inch permanently affixed letters, and the address 1856 and telephone number shall be in at least 1-inch permanently 1857 affixed letters. 1858 8.âVehicle entry for the purpose of removing the vehicle or 1859 vessel shall be allowed with reasonable care on the part of the 1860 person or firm towing the vehicle or vessel. Such person or firm 1861 shall be liable for any damage occasioned to the vehicle or 1862 vessel if such entry is not in accordance with the standard of 1863 reasonable care. 1864 9.âWhen a vehicle or vessel has been towed or removed 1865 pursuant to this section, it must be released to its owner or 1866 person in control or custody within 1 hour after requested. Any 1867 vehicle or vessel owner or person in control or custody has the 1868 right to inspect the vehicle or vessel before accepting its 1869 return, and no release or waiver of any kind which would release 1870 the person or firm towing the vehicle or vessel from liability 1871 for damages noted by the owner or person in control or custody 1872 at the time of the redemption may be required from any vehicle 1873 or vessel owner or person in control or custody as a condition 1874 of release of the vehicle or vessel to its owner or person in 1875 control or custody. A detailed receipt showing the legal name of 1876 the company or person towing or removing the vehicle or vessel 1877 must be given to the person paying towing or storage charges at 1878 the time of payment, whether requested or not. 1879 Section 42.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 1880 1006.23, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1881 1006.23âHazardous walking conditions.â 1882 (2)âHAZARDOUS WALKING CONDITIONS.â 1883 (a)âWalkways parallel to the road.â 1884 1.âIt shall be considered a hazardous walking condition 1885 with respect to any road along which students must walk in order 1886 to walk to and from school if there is not an area at least 4 1887 feet wide adjacent to the road, not including drainage ditches, 1888 sluiceways, swales, or channels, having a surface upon which 1889 students may walk without being required to walk on the road 1890 surface or if the walkway is along a limited access facility as 1891 defined in s. 334.03 s. 334.03(12). In addition, whenever the 1892 road along which students must walk is uncurbed and has a posted 1893 speed limit of 50 miles per hour or greater, the area as 1894 described above for students to walk upon shall be set off the 1895 road by no less than 3 feet from the edge of the road. 1896 2.âSubparagraph 1. does not apply when the road along which 1897 students must walk: 1898 a.âIs a road on which the volume of traffic is less than 1899 180 vehicles per hour, per direction, during the time students 1900 walk to and from school; or 1901 b.âIs located in a residential area and has a posted speed 1902 limit of 30 miles per hour or less. 1903 Section 43.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1904 made by this act to section 316.003, Florida Statutes, in a 1905 reference thereto, subsection (21) of section 320.02, Florida 1906 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1907 320.02âRegistration required; application for registration; 1908 forms.â 1909 (21)âA personal delivery device and a mobile carrier as 1910 defined in s. 316.003 are not required to satisfy the 1911 registration and insurance requirements of this section. 1912 Section 44.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1913 made by this act to section 316.003, Florida Statutes, in a 1914 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 324.021, Florida 1915 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1916 324.021âDefinitions; minimum insurance required.âThe 1917 following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall, for 1918 the purpose of this chapter, have the meanings respectively 1919 ascribed to them in this section, except in those instances 1920 where the context clearly indicates a different meaning: 1921 (1)âMOTOR VEHICLE.âEvery self-propelled vehicle that is 1922 designed and required to be licensed for use upon a highway, 1923 including trailers and semitrailers designed for use with such 1924 vehicles, except traction engines, road rollers, farm tractors, 1925 power shovels, and well drillers, and every vehicle that is 1926 propelled by electric power obtained from overhead wires but not 1927 operated upon rails, but not including any personal delivery 1928 device or mobile carrier as defined in s. 316.003, bicycle, 1929 electric bicycle, or moped. However, the term âmotor vehicleâ 1930 does not include a motor vehicle as defined in s. 627.732(3) 1931 when the owner of such vehicle has complied with the 1932 requirements of ss. 627.730-627.7405, inclusive, unless the 1933 provisions of s. 324.051 apply; and, in such case, the 1934 applicable proof of insurance provisions of s. 320.02 apply. 1935 Section 45.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1936 made by this act to section 316.003, Florida Statutes, in a 1937 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 1938 324.022, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1939 324.022âFinancial responsibility for property damage.â 1940 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 1941 (a)ââMotor vehicleâ means any self-propelled vehicle that 1942 has four or more wheels and that is of a type designed and 1943 required to be licensed for use on the highways of this state, 1944 and any trailer or semitrailer designed for use with such 1945 vehicle. The term does not include: 1946 1.âA mobile home. 1947 2.âA motor vehicle that is used in mass transit and 1948 designed to transport more than five passengers, exclusive of 1949 the operator of the motor vehicle, and that is owned by a 1950 municipality, transit authority, or political subdivision of the 1951 state. 1952 3.âA school bus as defined in s. 1006.25. 1953 4.âA vehicle providing for-hire transportation that is 1954 subject to the provisions of s. 324.031. A taxicab shall 1955 maintain security as required under s. 324.032(1). 1956 5.âA personal delivery device as defined in s. 316.003. 1957 Section 46.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.